inc/nouns.lexc
! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!!Plains Cree noun morphology                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! !!!Prefixes


LEXICON NounPrefixes

!! @LEXNAME@ redirects to AN-IN, BODY, INALIENABLE
! and EXPER

AN-IN       ; ! Animate and inanimate nouns
DEP-M-INIT  ; ! Dependent nouns, generic form with m-
DEP-KINTERMS ; ! Dependent nouns. The generic form is in the stem lexicon on its own.

LEXICON AN-IN
!! @LEXNAME@ adds the prefixes ni-, ki-, o-. Redirects to STEMS

!! Conversion from regular expressions
! This could be simplified substantially by marking only person, as in verbs.
! But that needs to be mirrored on the suffix side (which would become simpler as well).

@U.noun.abs@                    STEMS ;
@U.noun.1sg@:@U.noun.1sg@nit2%<   STEMS ; ! 1sg
@U.noun.2sg@:@U.noun.2sg@kit2%<   STEMS ; ! 2sg
@U.noun.3sg@:@U.noun.3sg@ot2%<    STEMS ; ! 3sg
@U.noun.4sg@:@U.noun.4sg@ot2%<    STEMS ; ! 4sg (3-sg-obv)
@U.noun.1pl@:@U.noun.1pl@nit2%<   STEMS ; ! exclusive 1pl
@U.noun.12pl@:@U.noun.12pl@kit2%< STEMS ; ! inclusive 1pl
@U.noun.2pl@:@U.noun.2pl@kit2%<   STEMS ; ! 2pl
@U.noun.3pl@:@U.noun.3pl@ot2%<    STEMS ; ! 3pl
@U.noun.4pl@:@U.noun.4pl@ot2%<    STEMS ; ! 4pl (3-pl-obv)

!! Prior format using regular expressions

!            @U.noun.abs@            STEMS ; 
! < 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 1
! < 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2
! < 0:o     "@U.noun.3sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3
! < 0:o     "@U.noun.4sg@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-singular-obviative
! < 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
! < 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.12pl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
! < 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2pl 
! < 0:o     "@U.noun.3pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3pl
! < 0:o     "@U.noun.4pl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-plural-obviate


LEXICON DEP-M-INIT
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o- (which alternate to w- in twolc), and generic form m- . Redirects to DEP-M-INIT.
< 0:m "@U.noun.abs@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.4sg@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.4pl@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !



LEXICON DEP-KINTERMS
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o- (which alternate to w- in twolc) Redirects to DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 1
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 2
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3
< 0:o "@U.noun.4sg@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3indef
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 2pl 
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3pl 
< 0:o "@U.noun.4pl@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 



!! Now, lexc directs us to the ../stems/nouns.lexc file,
!! where we find all the nominal stems. The suffixes are then
!! found at the end of this file.

! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================



!! !!!Suffixes


!! !!The declensions for Animates 



LEXICON AN_DECL_0POSS !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis and -is 
ANABSDECL ;
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_0POSS ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_Pl_0POSS ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIM ;

LEXICON AN_DECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis and -is 
ANABSDECL_PL ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIM ;

LEXICON AN_DECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -is diminutives
ANABSDECL ;
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;

! The following does not seem to work, even though it is a carbon copy of AN_DECLis and IN_DECLisis

LEXICON AN_DECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis diminutives
 ANimDECLisis ;

LEXICON AN_DECL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>i2m          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>i2m          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
 +N+AN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Use/NG:%>i2m%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Use/NG:%>i2m%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !

LEXICON ANimDECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -isis
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>i2m          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>i2m          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Use/NG:%>i2m%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Use/NG:%>i2m%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !

LEXICON ANimDECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>i2m          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>i2m          ANSUFF_PL  ;
!                +N+AN:%>i2m          ANSUFF_LOC ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
!   +N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_LOC ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !


LEXICON ANimDECLw !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, stem -w, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@a SG_ ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@  OBVIATIVE ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Pl:@U.noun.abs@  PLak ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN:@U.noun.abs@     LOC ; 

!< "+N":a "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_  ; ! -a
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > OBVIATIVE  ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > PLak  ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > LOC  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>i2m          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>i2m          ANSUFF_PL  ;
!                +N+AN:%>i2m          ANSUFF_LOC ;
!        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
!   +N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_LOC ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !


LEXICON AN_DIM !!= * @CODE@ both for lexicalised and derivated diminutives
!   +N+AN: ANSUFF_LOC ;
          ANABSDECL  ;
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG  ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL  ;


LEXICON ANimDECLnaahk !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is, , with collectiv loc
                                     ANABSDECLnaahk  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>i2m          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>i2m          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
 +N+AN+Der/Dim+Use/NG:%>i2s%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>i2m%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !

LEXICON ANABSDECLnaahk !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension, with collectiv loc
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ SG_ ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Pl:@U.noun.abs@ PLak ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ OBVIATIVE ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN:@U.noun.abs@    LOCinaahk ;
 
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCinaahk       ;


LEXICON ANimDECLnaahk-NOPOSS !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is, , with collectiv loc
                                     ANABSDECLnaahk  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !


LEXICON ANABSDECL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ SG_ ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Pl:@U.noun.abs@ PLak ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ OBVIATIVE ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN:@U.noun.abs@    LOC ;

!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC       ; !

LEXICON ANABSDECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Pl:@U.noun.abs@ PLak ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN:@U.noun.abs@    LOC ;

!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC       ; !


LEXICON AN_GENERIC
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ SG_ ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Pl:@U.noun.abs@ PLak ; 
@U.noun.abs@+N+AN+Sg:@U.noun.abs@ OBVIATIVE ; 

!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_       ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > PLak      ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!



LEXICON AN_KININFL_MONOG !!= * @CODE@ Lexicon with reduces possessive paradigm: only one wife/husband
@U.noun.1sg@+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg:@U.noun.1sg@          SG_ ;
@U.noun.2sg@+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg:@U.noun.2sg@          SG_ ;
@U.noun.3sg@+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg:@U.noun.3sg@          OBVIATIVE ;
@U.noun.4sg@+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg:@U.noun.4sg@i2yiw     OBVIATIVE ;
@U.noun.1pl@+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl:@U.noun.1pl@i2nân     PLak ;
@U.noun.12pl@+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl:@U.noun.12pl@i2naw  PLak ;
@U.noun.2pl@+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl:@U.noun.2pl@i2wâw     PLak ;
@U.noun.3pl@+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl:@U.noun.3pl@i2wâw     OBVIATIVE ;
@U.noun.4pl@+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl:@U.noun.4pl@i2yiw     OBVIATIVE ;

!< "+N":i2 "+AN":m "+Sg":â                             0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > #         ; !generic form
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px1Sg":0                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_       ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px2Sg":0                 "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_       ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px3Sg":0                 "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0  "+Px4Sg":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px1Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > PLak      ; ! exclusive Pl
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "+Px12Pl":0 0:i2 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > PLak      ; ! inclusive Pl
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px2Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > PLak      ; !
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px3Pl":0 0:i2 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; ! 3rd person  possessor, hence Pl is -a
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0  "+Px4Pl":0 0:i2 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 3rd person  possessor, hence Pl is -a

LEXICON AN_DECL-ATIM	!!= * @CODE@ for atim and mistatim.
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  #         ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak     ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE      ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0         "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC ; ! ohk
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%>        ANABSDECL ;

LEXICON ANPOSS-ATIM !!= * @CODE@ is also there to handle the highly irregular atim and mistatim
!< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_ ; !Baseform for dep nouns
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;

LEXICON ANVOC !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: # ;

LEXICON AN_KININFL !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;

LEXICON AN_KININFL_PL !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>i2s%^DIMis%> AN_DIMPOSS ;

LEXICON AN_DIMPOSS !!= * @CODE@ Possessive suffixes to diminutives
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG ; !
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL ; !
!+N+AN: ANSUFF_LOC ;
